Hawaii statutes.
§602-2 Salary, supreme court justices.
Effective July 1, 2004, the salary of the chief justice of the supreme court
and the salary of each associate justice of the supreme court shall be as last
recommended by the judicial salary commission. Effective July 1, 2007, and
every six years thereafter, the salary of the chief justice of the supreme
court and the salary of each associate justice of the supreme court shall be as
last recommended by the commission on salaries pursuant to section 26‑56,
unless disapproved by the legislature. [L Sp 1959 1st, c 4, §1; am L 1962, c
28, §30a; am L 1965, c 223, §12; Supp, §214-1.5; HRS §602-2; am L 1969, c 127,
§10; am L 1975, c 58, §26; ree L 1979, c 111, pt of §2; am L 1982, c 129,
§25(1); am L 1986, c 128, §22; am L 1990, c 72, §3; am L 1999, c 65, §4; am L
2000, c 2, §2; am L 2003, c 123, §2; am L 2006, c 299, §7]

Case Notes

Cited: 57 H. 348, 555 P.2d 1329 (1976).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next